Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BASE YEAR FORMULA AID FOR THE CITY OF NORTHERN.new text end new text begin For the calculation under Minnesota Statutes, section 477A.013, subdivisions 8 and 9, for aids payable in 2027, the city of Northern's aid for 2026, used in calculating aid payable in 2027, is deemed to be equal to $116.91 multiplied by Northern's 2024 population. new text end